Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4606
Provision of services to claimant;
how treated.

Nothing
contained in the Nebraska Claims for Wrongful Conviction and Imprisonment
Act shall preclude the state from providing services to the claimant upon
exoneration, and the reasonable value of services provided shall be treated
as an advance against any award or judgment under the act.

Laws 2009, LB260, § 6.